test/src/morphology/N-steehl_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - steehl u-stem lasi: # Noun - full paradigm
     steehl+N+Sg+Nom: steehl
     steehl+N+Sg+Gen: steehl
     steehl+N+Sg+Acc: steehl
     steehl+N+Sg+Ill: steehlu
     steehl+N+Sg+Loc: steehlast
     steehl+N+Sg+Com: steehlain
     steehl+N+Ess: steehlan
     steehl+N+Par: steehlad
     steehl+N+Sg+Abe: steehltää
     steehl+N+Pl+Nom: steehl
     steehl+N+Pl+Gen: steehlai
     steehl+N+Pl+Acc: steehlaid
     steehl+N+Pl+Ill: steehlaid
     steehl+N+Pl+Loc: steehlain
     steehl+N+Pl+Com: steehlaivui′m
     steehl+N+Pl+Abe: steehlaitää
